Utah statutes.
39-6-95.   Malingering.

A person subject to this chapter shall be punished as a military court directs who, for the purpose of avoiding work, duty, or service in the National Guard:

(1)  feigns illness, physical disablement, mental or emotional difficulties, or mental derangement; or

(2)  intentionally injures himself.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

